es: Tipo de servicio: Función como servicio (FaaS); Infraestructura como servicio (IaaS); Plataforma como servicio (PaaS); Software como servicio (SaaS); Otros
sv: Typ av tjänst: Funktion som en tjänst (FaaS); Infrastruktur som en tjänst (IaaS); Plattform som en tjänst (PaaS); Programvara som en tjänst (SaaS); Övrigt
lt-LT: Paslaugos tipas: Veikia kaip paslauga (FaaS); Infrastruktūra kaip paslauga (IaaS); Platforma kaip paslauga (PaaS); Programinė įranga kaip paslauga (SaaS); Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta usluge: Funkcija kao usluga (FaaS); Infrastruktura kao usluga (IaaS); Platforma kao usluga (PaaS); Softver kao usluga (SaaS); Ostalo
cs: Typ služby: Funkce jako služba (FaaS); Infrastruktura jako služba (IaaS); Platforma jako služba (PaaS); Software jako služba (SaaS); Jiné
ru: Тип услуги: Функция как услуга (FaaS); Инфраструктура как услуга (IaaS); Платформа как услуга (PaaS); Программное обеспечение как услуга (SaaS); Другое
fr: Type de service: Function as a service (FaaS); Infrastructure as a service (IaaS); Platform as a service (PaaS); Logiciel en tant que service (SaaS); Autre
da: Servicetype: Function-as-a-service (FaaS); Infrastructure-as-a-service (IaaS); Platform-as-a-service (PaaS); Software-as-a-service (SaaS); Andet
hu: Szolgáltatás típusa: Szolgáltatásként működik (FaaS); Infrastruktúra mint szolgáltatás (IaaS); Platform mint szolgáltatás (PaaS); Szoftver mint szolgáltatás (SaaS); Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de serviço: Função como serviço (FaaS); Infraestrutura como serviço (IaaS); Plataforma como serviço (PaaS); Software como serviço (SaaS); Outro
de: Servicetyp: Function-as-a-Service (FaaS); Infrastructure-as-a-Service (IaaS); Platform-as-a-Service (PaaS); Software-as-a-Service (SaaS); Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип услуга: Функция като услуга (FaaS); Инфраструктура като услуга (IaaS); Платформа като услуга (PaaS); Софтуер като услуга (SaaS); Други
fi: Palvelutyyppi: Toiminnallisuus palveluna (FaaS); Infrastruktuuri palveluna (IaaS); Sovellusalusta palveluna (PaaS); Ohjelmisto palveluna (SaaS); Muu
el: Τύπος υπηρεσίας: Λειτουργία ως υπηρεσία (FaaS); Υποδομή ως υπηρεσία (IaaS); Πλατφόρμα ως υπηρεσία (PaaS); Λογισμικό ως υπηρεσία (SaaS); Άλλο
it: Tipo di servizio: Function as a Service (FaaS); Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS); Platform as a service (PaaS); Software as a Service (SaaS); Altro
sk-SK: Typ služby: Funkcia ako služba (FaaS); Infraštruktúra ako služba (IaaS); Platforma ako služba (PaaS); Softvér ako služba (SaaS); Iné
nb: Tjenestetype: Funksjon som en tjeneste (FaaS); Infrastruktur som en tjeneste (IaaS); Plattform som en tjeneste (PaaS); Programvare som en tjeneste (SaaS); Annet
tr: Hizmet türü: Hizmet olarak işlev (FaaS); Hizmet olarak altyapı (IaaS); Hizmet olarak platform (PaaS); Hizmet olarak yazılım (SaaS); Diğer
ja: サービスの種類: サービスとしての機能 (FaaS); サービスとしてのインフラストラクチャ (IaaS); サービスとしてのプラットフォーム (PaaS); サービスとしてのソフトウェア (SaaS); その他
pt-PT: Tipo de serviço: Função como serviço (FaaS); Infraestrutura como serviço (IaaS); Plataforma como serviço (PaaS); Software como serviço (SaaS); Outro
vi: Loại dịch vụ: Chức năng dưới dạng dịch vụ (FaaS); Cơ sở hạ tầng dưới dạng dịch vụ (IaaS); Nền tảng dưới dạng dịch vụ (PaaS); Phần mềm dưới dạng dịch vụ (SaaS); Khác
zh-TW: 服務類型: 功能即服務 (FaaS); 基礎設施即服務 (IaaS); 平台即服務 (PaaS); 軟體即服務 (SaaS); 其他
zh-CN: 服务类型: 功能即服务 (FaaS); 基础设施即服务 (IaaS); 平台即服务 (PaaS); 软件即服务 (SaaS); 其他
ko: 서비스 유형: 서비스형 함수(FaaS); 서비스형 인프라스트럭처(IaaS); 서비스형 플랫폼(PaaS); 서비스형 소프트웨어(SaaS); 기타
pl: Typ usługi: Funkcja jako usługa (FaaS); Infrastruktura jako usługa (IaaS); Platforma jako usługa (PaaS); Oprogramowanie jako usługa (SaaS); Inne
en: Service type: Function as a service (FaaS); Infrastructure as a service (IaaS); Platform as a service (PaaS); Software as a service (SaaS); Other
nl: Type service: Function as a Service (FaaS); Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS); Platform as a Service (PaaS); Software as a Service (SaaS); Andere
th: ประเภทบริการ: การให้บริการฟังก์ชัน (FaaS); การให้บริการโครงสร้างพื้นฐานระบบไอที (IaaS); การให้บริการแพลตฟอร์ม (PaaS); การให้บริการซอฟต์แวร์ (SaaS); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta storitve: Funkcija kot storitev (FaaS); Infrastruktura kot storitev (IaaS); Platforma kot storitev (PaaS); Programska oprema kot storitev (SaaS); Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul serviciului: Function as a service (FaaS); Infrastructure as a service (IaaS); Platform as a service (PaaS); Software as a service (SaaS); Altele